Washington statutes.
RCW 36.88.440

Underground electric and communication facilities, installation or conversion to—Contracts with electric and communication utilities—Authorized—Provisions.

Every county shall have the power to contract with electric and communication utilities for the conversion of existing overhead electric and communication facilities to underground facilities, for the conversion of existing street and road lighting facilities to ornamental street and road lighting facilities to be served from underground electrical facilities[,] for the initial installation of ornamental street and road lighting facilities to be served from underground electrical facilities and for the initial installation of underground electric and communication facilities. Such contracts may provide, among other provisions, any of the following:

(1) For the supplying and approval by the electric and communication utilities of plans and specifications for such conversion or installation;

(2) For the payment to the electric and communication utilities for any work performed or services rendered by it in connection with the conversion project or installation;

(3) For the payment to the electric and communication utilities for the value of the overhead facilities removed pursuant to the conversion;

(4) For ownership of the underground facilities and the ornamental street and road lighting facilities by the electric and communication utilities.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 103 s 3; 1967 c 194 s 4.]